Utah statutes.
63C-13-108.   Authority member ethics and conflicts of interest.

(1)  An authority member is subject to Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act.

(2)  An individual may not be appointed to the authority if the individual:

(a)  has an ownership interest in or is an officer or employee of an entity that:

(i)  anticipates submitting a proposal or submits a proposal for a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project; or

(ii)  anticipates providing material or labor under a contract awarded pursuant to a proposal for a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project;

(b)  has a spouse, child, parent, or sibling who has an ownership interest in or is an officer or employee of an entity described in Subsection (2)(a); or

(c)  has a direct or indirect interest in or derives or will derive any direct or indirect financial benefit from any work done in pursuit of a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project.

(3)  An authority member may not accept a gift, gratuity, emolument, or employment from any person that has a direct or indirect interest in or will derive any direct or indirect financial benefit from any work performed as part of a new prison development project, current prison land development project, or master development project.

(4)  An authority member may not continue to serve on the authority and shall resign the member's position on the authority if a circumstance described in Subsection (2) occurs or is discovered after the member's appointment that, had it occurred or been discovered before appointment, would have prohibited the member from being appointed to the authority.



Enacted by Chapter 228, 2013 General Session

